Idaho, session 2026, H0741.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 52, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-5207A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-5207A. PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL EARNED AUTONOMY. (1) Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, a public charter school that is not a
virtual school, as defined in section 33-5202A, Idaho Code, and that sat-
isfies the requirements set forth in section 33-5218(2)(b), (e), and (g),
Idaho Code, may spend its allocated state funding, including but not limited
to discretionary funds, categorical funds, and salary apportionment, in the
manner it deems best serves students and the public charter school. Partici-
pation shall not require a revision to the public charter school's charter or
performance certificate.
(2) State funding for participating public charter schools shall be
based on each school's per-pupil funding in the prior fiscal year, adjusted
to account for changes in statewide education funding and changes in the
school's population in the subsequent year, by multiplying the total state
funding allocated to the public charter school per-pupil in the prior fiscal
year by the year-over-year change. To determine the year-over-year change:
(a) Divide the prior fiscal year's total state funds by the prior fiscal
year's support units;
(b) Divide the subsequent fiscal year's total state funds by the subse-
quent fiscal year's support units; and
(c) Calculate the difference between the results of paragraphs (a) and
(b) of this subsection.
(3) Participating public charter schools shall be exempt from the re-
porting requirements, including reporting requirements established through
rulemaking authority, pursuant to sections 33-119, 33-1002, 33-1002B,
33-1004E, 33-1007, 33-1405, 33-1805, 33-1811, and 33-2004, Idaho Code,
without incurring a penalty or a reduction in funding.
(4) Participating public charter schools shall automatically maintain
spending flexibility from year to year, except that the state department of
education may revoke eligibility if:
(a) The school fails to receive an annual unmodified audit opinion or if
the auditor's report on internal controls reports one (1) or more mate-
rial weaknesses or significant deficiencies;


(b) The school fails to satisfy the academic requirements set forth in
section 33-5218(2)(g), Idaho Code, for two (2) or more years; or
(c) The school's charter is subsequently revoked, not renewed, or re-
newed with conditions.
(5) Teachers who transition from a participating public charter school
to another public school shall be considered to have advanced along the ca-
reer ladder for each year of work at the participating school.
(6) In 2029, the state board of education shall report to the legis-
lature the number of participating schools and changes, if any, in student
growth or proficiency on the Idaho standards achievement test.
(7) Nothing in this section shall impact the appropriation of federal
and dedicated funds. State funding for public charter schools that are not
participants in the spending flexibility provided in this section shall
continue to be calculated and allocated pursuant to section 33-5207, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.